District of Columbia statutes.
5-417.02

Compliance with fire code and occupancy requirements — Authority, generally; authority to enter and examine; sanctions.

(a)

The Fire Chief, the Fire Marshal, or his or her authorized representative shall have the authority to enter upon or examine any area, building or premises, vehicle or other thing during normal business hours to inspect for compliance with the District fire code, or enter any building at any time when there is probable cause to believe that the premises may be overcrowded.

(b)

The Fire Chief, the Fire Marshal, or his or her authorized representative shall have the authority to sanction a restaurant or other public venue for failure to post a seating or occupancy capacity placard; provided, that no restaurant or public venue shall be liable for the resulting fine or penalty unless the Mayor has provided the seating or occupancy capacity placard to the owner of the premises.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-176, § 2a
as added June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 506, 60 DCR 3390

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320 added this section.

Effect of Amendments